Nebraska, session 109, LB280.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB280 LB280
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 2-1202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
2-1202 (1) The commission shall elect one of its members to be
chairperson thereof, and it shall be authorized to employ such other
assistants and employees as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of
sections 2-1201 to 2-1218, the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, and
sections 9-1201 to 9-1209 and section 7 of this act. The commission shall
employ an executive director who shall be selected by the commission
subject to the approval of the Governor. The executive director shall
devote full time to the duties of the office and shall not engage in any
other business or profession or hold any other state public office. The
executive director shall keep a record of the proceedings of the
commission, preserve the books, records, and documents entrusted to the
executive director, and perform such other duties as the commission shall
prescribe; and the commission shall require the executive director to
give bond in such sum as it may fix, conditioned for the faithful
performance of the duties of the executive director. The commission shall
be authorized to fix the compensation of the executive director, and also
the compensation of its other employees, subject to the approval of the
Governor. The commission shall have an office at such place within the
state as it may determine and shall meet at least eight times per year.
(2) The commission shall appoint or employ deputies, investigators,
inspectors, agents, security personnel, and other persons as deemed
necessary to administer and effectively enforce the regulation of
horseracing, the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, and sections 9-1201 to
9-1209 and section 7 of this act. Any appointed or employed personnel
shall perform the duties assigned by the commission.
(3) All personnel appointed or employed by the commission shall be
bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. As specified by the
commission, certain personnel shall be vested with the authority and
power of a law enforcement officer to carry out the laws of this state
-2-

LB280 LB280
2025 2025
administered by the commission.
Sec. 2. Section 9-1107, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1107 The Racing and Gaming Commission's Racetrack Gaming Fund is
created. The fund shall consist of all license, application, and other
fees collected under the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act. The fund shall be
used for administration of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act and for any
audit, examination, or review required or authorized pursuant to section
7 of this act. Any money in the Racing and Gaming Commission's Racetrack
Gaming Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be
credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 9-1202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1202 For purposes of sections 9-1201 to 9-1209 and section 7 of
this act:
(1) Authorized gaming operator means a person or entity licensed
pursuant to the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act to operate games of chance
within a licensed racetrack enclosure;
(2) Designated sports wagering area means an area, as designated by
the gaming commission, in which sports wagering is conducted;
(3) Dollar amount collected means the total dollar amount wagered by
players of games of chance less the total dollar amount returned to such
players as prizes;
(4) Game of chance means any game which has the elements of chance,
prize, and consideration, including any wager on a slot machine, table
game, counter game, or card game, a keno lottery conducted in accordance
with the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, or sports wagering. Game
of chance does not include any game the operation of which is prohibited
-3-

LB280 LB280
2025 2025
at a casino by federal law;
(5) Gaming commission means the State Racing and Gaming Commission;
(6) Gross gaming revenue means the dollar amount collected by an
authorized gaming operator from operation of all games of chance within a
licensed racetrack enclosure as computed pursuant to applicable statutes,
rules, and regulations less the total of (a) all federal taxes, other
than income taxes, imposed on the operation of such games of chance and
(b) the amount provided to players by an authorized gaming operator as
promotional gaming credits, but only to the extent such promotional
gaming credits are redeemed by players to play one or more games of
chance being operated by the authorized gaming operator;
(7) Licensed racetrack enclosure means a premises at which licensed
live horseracing is conducted in accordance with the Constitution of
Nebraska and applicable Nebraska law;
(8) Promotional gaming credit means a credit, token, or other item
of value provided by an authorized gaming operator to a player for the
purpose of enabling the player to play a game of chance; and
(9) Sports wagering has the same meaning as in section 9-1103.
Sec. 4. Section 9-1205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1205 Every authorized gaming operator subject to taxation as set
forth in sections 9-1201 to 9-1209 and section 7 of this act shall pay
such tax by the fifteenth of each month to the gaming commission and make
report thereof to the gaming commission under such rules and regulations
as may be prescribed by the gaming commission.
Sec. 5. Section 9-1206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1206 If the tax provided for in sections 9-1201 to 9-1209 and
section 7 of this act is not paid within such time as provided in section
9-1205 or as may be prescribed for payment thereof by rules and
regulations prescribed by the gaming commission, the same shall become
-4-

LB280 LB280
2025 2025
delinquent and a penalty of ten percent shall be added thereto, together
with interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate
may from time to time be adjusted, until paid.
Sec. 6. Section 9-1207, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1207 Any authorized gaming operator that willfully fails,
neglects, or refuses to make any report required by sections 9-1201 to
9-1209 and section 7 of this act, or by rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated under sections 9-1201 to 9-1209 and section 7 of this act, or
that knowingly makes any false statement in any such report, is guilty of
a Class IV felony.
Sec. 7. (1) Each authorized gaming operator shall cause an audit to
be performed, at its own expense, of the annual financial statements,
including a report on the internal control system, covering all financial
transactions and affairs of the authorized gaming operator in Nebraska
for the preceding fiscal year. The annual audit shall be performed by an
independent certified public accountant who is, or whose firm is,
authorized to practice accountancy in the State of Nebraska.
(2)(a) The audit required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be completed and the annual audit report shall be submitted
electronically to both the Auditor of Public Accounts and the gaming
commission within six months after the close of the fiscal year being
audited unless an extension is granted in writing by the Auditor of
Public Accounts.
(b) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall review the annual audit
report for errors in mathematics, improper accounting, or other
deficiencies, especially any affecting the proper calculation of either
the gross gaming revenue generated by the authorized gaming operator or
the annual gaming tax imposed thereon. The Auditor of Public Accounts
shall report the results of the review electronically to the Governor,
the Legislature, and the gaming commission.
-5-

LB280 LB280
2025 2025
(c) The expenses of the review by the Auditor of Public Accounts
shall be paid from the Racing and Gaming Commission's Racetrack Gaming
Fund.
(3)(a) The Auditor of Public Accounts may examine or cause to be
examined at his or her discretion the books, records, funds, and accounts
of an authorized gaming operator pertaining to the annual gaming tax
imposed on the gross gaming revenue generated by such authorized gaming
operator pursuant to section 9-1203. Such examination shall include, but
not be limited to, an assessment of whether the annual gaming tax is
being calculated, collected, and credited to the Property Tax Credit Cash
Fund as required by law. The examination shall be done in accordance with
generally accepted government auditing standards for financial audits and
attestation engagements set forth in Government Auditing Standards
published by the Comptroller General of the United States, Government
Accountability Office.
(b) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall submit a report of such
examination to the Governor, the Legislature, and the gaming commission.
The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically.
(c) The expenses of the examination shall be paid from the Racing
and Gaming Commission's Racetrack Gaming Fund.
Sec. 8. Original sections 9-1202, 9-1205, 9-1206, and 9-1207,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 2-1202 and 9-1107,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-6-